incubator/apertium-mk-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="mal__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kufi__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jsh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jtë</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jtë</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dogan/ë__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ën</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="doganë"><i>dogan</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kufi"><i>kufi</i><par n="kufi__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aleancë"><i>aleanc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ambasadë"><i>ambasad</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bazilikë"><i>bazilik</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bursë"><i>burs</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="demonstratë"><i>demonstrat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dilemë"><i>dilem</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dogmë"><i>dogm</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fshehtë"><i>fsheht</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gjykatë"><i>gjykat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gojëdhënë"><i>gojëdhën</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kaptinë"><i>kaptin</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kompetencë"><i>kompetenc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="korporatë"><i>korporat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kryqëzatë"><i>kryqëzat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="merimangë"><i>merimang</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ofensivë"><i>ofensiv</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="orbitë"><i>orbit</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="seancë"><i>seanc</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shkretëtirë"><i>shkretëtir</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shkollë"><i>shkoll</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shoqatë"><i>shoqat</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skemë"><i>skem</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tepricë"><i>tepric</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="unazë"><i>unaz</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="veturë"><i>vetur</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="yndyrë"><i>yndyr</i><par n="dogan/ë__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aksident"><i>aksident</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aksion"><i>aksion</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aktivitet"><i>aktivitet</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="album"><i>album</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="atom"><i>atom</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="autoritet"><i>autoritet</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="besim"><i>besim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bombardim"><i>bombardim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="botëkuptim"><i>botëkuptim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="botim"><i>botim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="debat"><i>debat</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dështim"><i>dështim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dialekt"><i>dialekt</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dorëshkrim"><i>dorëshkrim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ekuacion"><i>ekuacion</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="elektron"><i>elektron</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fjalim"><i>fjalim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="format"><i>format</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="funksion"><i>funksion</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gjykim"><i>gjykim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hormon"><i>hormon</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ind"><i>ind</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="katund"><i>katund</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klub"><i>klub</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="konflikt"><i>konflikt</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="krim"><i>krim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kurriz"><i>kurriz</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="manipulim"><i>manipulim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="minoritet"><i>minoritet</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ndërtim"><i>ndërtim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="objekt"><i>objekt</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="peizazh"><i>peizazh</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="përkthim"><i>përkthim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="portret"><i>portret</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="premtim"><i>premtim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="program"><i>program</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="punim"><i>punim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="raport"><i>raport</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="redaktim"><i>redaktim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="shënim"><i>shënim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="shërbim"><i>shërbim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="shpërblim"><i>shpërblim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="simbol"><i>simbol</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stacion"><i>stacion</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="studim"><i>studim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sulm"><i>sulm</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="territor"><i>territor</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="traktat"><i>traktat</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tubim"><i>tubim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ushqim"><i>ushqim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vendbanim"><i>vendbanim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="veprim"><i>veprim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vilajet"><i>vilajet</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="volum"><i>volum</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zhanr"><i>zhanr</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
